Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CARVER COUNTY; COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 51 AND U.S. HIGHWAY 212 INTERSECTION SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $6,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Carver County for the design, engineering, and construction of improvements to the intersection of Carver County State-Aid Highway 51 and U.S. Highway 212. This project includes County State-Aid Highway 51 roadway construction, a bridge over U.S. Highway 212, side street construction, drainage, and water quality improvements. This appropriation is available when the commissioner of management and budget determines that an amount sufficient has been committed to complete the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end